Alabama, session 2026rs, HB468.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Notwithstanding Section 11-52-3, Code of
Alabama 1975, municipalities with 7,500 residents or less may
authorize individuals who hold a municipal office to serve on
a municipal planning commission, pursuant to Chapter 52 of
Title 11, Code of Alabama 1975.
Section 2. (a) Notwithstanding Chapters 88 and 89 of
Title 11, Code of Alabama 1975, a county commission may
authorize municipal officers to serve on a board of directors
for a county water, sewer, or fire protection authority.
(b) This section shall not affect the prohibition on
Page 1

(b) This section shall not affect the prohibition on
HB468 Engrossed
state or county officers from serving on any county board of
directors for a water, sewer, or fire protection district or
authority pursuant to Chapters 88 and 89 of Title 11, Code of
Alabama 1975.
Section 3. Notwithstanding Chapters 89 and 89A of Title
11, Code of Alabama 1975, an appointing or governing authority
of a municipality or county may appoint any county or
municipal official who does not serve on the appointing or
governing authority to a solid waste disposal district or
authority.
Section 4. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
HB468 Engrossed


House of Representatives
Read for the first time and referred ................17-Feb-26
to the House of Representatives
committee on County and Municipal
Government

Read for the second time and placed ................25-Feb-26
on the calendar:
0 amendments

Read for the third time and passed ................10-Mar-26
as amended
Yeas 104
Nays 0
Abstains 0


John Treadwell
Clerk

Page 3